California statutes. Public Contract Code
(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the estimated cost of the project, the methodology that will be used by the transportation entity to evaluate proposals, whether the contract will be awarded on the basis of the lowest responsible bid or on best value, and any other information deemed necessary by the transportation entity to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the transportation entity reasonably expects to consider in evaluating proposals, including, but not limited to, cost or price and all nonprice-related factors.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for proposals.

(4) For transportation entities authorized to utilize best value as a selection method, the transportation entity reserves the right to request proposal revisions and hold discussions and negotiations with responsive bidders and shall so specify in the request for proposals and shall publish separately or incorporate into the request for proposals applicable rules and procedures to be observed by the transportation entity to ensure that any discussions or negotiations are
 conducted in good faith.

(c) Based on the documents prepared under subdivision (a), the transportation entity shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify or short-list the design-build entities whose proposals shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the transportation entity to evaluate proposals, the procedure for final selection of the design-build entity, and any other information deemed necessary by the transportation entity to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) (A) Significant factors that the transportation entity reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, skilled labor force availability, and all other nonprice-related factors.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), skilled labor force availability shall be determined by the existence of an agreement with a registered apprenticeship program, approved by the California Apprenticeship Council, that has graduated at least one apprentice in each of the preceding five years. This graduation requirement shall not apply to programs providing apprenticeship training for any craft that was first deemed by the Department of Labor and the Department of Industrial Relations to be an apprenticeable craft
 within the five years prior to the effective date of this article.

(3) A standard form request for statements of qualifications prepared by the transportation entity. In preparing the standard form, the transportation entity may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other public agencies interested in using the authorization provided by this chapter. The standard form shall require information including,
 but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) If the design-build entity is a partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, or other association, a listing of all of the partners, general partners, or association members known at the time of statement of qualification submission who will participate in the design-build contract.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build entity have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that assures the transportation entity that the design-build
 entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) A full disclosure regarding all of the following that are applicable:

(i) Any serious or willful violation of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596), settled against any member of the design-build entity.

(ii) Any debarment, disqualification, or removal from a federal, state, or local government public works project.

(iii) Any instance where the design-build entity, or its owners, officers, or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works project and were found to be nonresponsive or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(iv) Any instance where the design-build entity, or its owners, officers, or managing employees defaulted on a construction contract.

(v) Any violations of the Contractors’ State License Law, as described in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, including alleged violations of federal or state law regarding the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or Federal Insurance Contribution Act (FICA) withholding requirements settled against any member of the design-build entity.

(vi) Any bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the design-build entity, including, but not limited to, information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(vii) Any settled adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any
 member of the design-build entity during the five years preceding submission of a bid under this article, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this five-year period.

(G) If the proposed design-build entity is a partnership, limited partnership, joint-venture, or other association, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the organization, and a statement that all general partners, joint venture members, or other association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the design-build contract.

(H) An acceptable safety record. A bidder’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience
 modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury/illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the bidder is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(4) The information required under this subdivision shall be verified under oath by the design-build entity and its members in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information required under this subdivision that is not a public record under the California Public Records Act, as described in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall not be open to public
 inspection.

(d) For those projects utilizing low bid as the final selection method, the competitive bidding process shall result in lump-sum bids by the prequalified or short-listed design-build entities. Awards shall be made to the lowest responsible bidder.

(e) For those projects utilizing best value as a selection method, the design-build competition shall progress as follows:

(1) Competitive proposals shall be evaluated by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically identified in the request for proposals. However, the following minimum factors shall be weighted as deemed appropriate by the contracting transportation entity:

(A) Price.

(B) Technical design and construction expertise.

(C) Life-cycle costs over 15 years or more.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (b), the transportation entity may hold discussions or negotiations with responsive bidders using the process articulated in the transportation entity’s request for proposals.

(3) When the evaluation is complete, the top three responsive bidders shall be ranked sequentially based on a determination of value provided.

(4) The award of the contract shall be made to the responsible bidder whose proposal is determined by the transportation entity to have
 offered the best value to the public.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the transportation entity shall publicly announce its award, identifying the contractor to whom the award is made, along with a written decision supporting its contract award and stating the basis of the award. The notice of award shall also include the transportation entity’s second- and third-ranked design-build entities.

(6) The written decision supporting the transportation entity’s contract award, described in paragraph (5), and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 355.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6825.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the transportation entity, and issued by a California admitted surety. In no case shall the amount of the payment bond be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6826.

(a) The transportation entity, in each design-build request for proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that must be included in the design-build entity statement of qualifications and proposal. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the proposal shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2.

(b) In awarding subcontracts not listed in the request for proposals, the design-build entity shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the transportation entity.

(2) Provide a fixed date and time on which the subcontracted work will be awarded.

(3) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(4) Provide that the subcontracted construction work shall be awarded either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder.
 For construction work awarded on a best value basis, the design-build entity shall evaluate all bids utilizing the factors described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 6824, and shall award the contract to the bidder determined by the design-build entity to have offered the best value.

(c) Subcontractors awarded subcontracts under this chapter shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6826.5.

The department shall submit a report to the transportation and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before January 1, 2033, on its experience with use of the design-build method of procurement pursuant to this chapter, in terms of the relative costs and value of, and time to complete, projects that used the design-build method of procurement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6827.

Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6828.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6829.

(a) This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if any provision or application of Section 91.2 of the Streets and Highways Code is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, this chapter shall be repealed one year from the date in which the department
 posts on its internet website that Section 91.2 of the Streets and Highways Code has been held invalid.

(c) The repeal of this chapter shall not affect an executed design-build contract or cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter prior to the date of its repeal, regardless of the stage of the project at the time of repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   (AB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 6.5, commencing with Section 6820.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.6. Alternative Project Delivery Program: Construction Manager/General Contractor Authority [6950. - 6958.]

6950.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The alternative public works project delivery methods authorized under this chapter should be evaluated for the purposes of exploring whether the potential exists for reduced project costs, expedited project completion, or design features that are not achievable through the traditional project delivery methods.

(b) The design sequencing and Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery methods rely on existing design-bid-build and design-build procurement methods respectively and have been successfully used by both public and private sector entities in
 California and other states for over a decade on projects that require a quick startup as they allow construction to begin before the design plans are complete for the entire project.

(c) Both methods also have the benefit of allowing for earlier collaboration between the project owner and construction contractor.

(d) This chapter shall not be deemed to provide a preference for these project delivery methods over other delivery methodologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6951.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Alternative project delivery method” means either Construction Manager/General Contractor method or design sequencing.

(b) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” or “CMGC” means a project delivery method using a best value procurement process in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.

(c) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services as needed pursuant to a CMGC contract.

(d) “Design sequencing” means a method of project delivery
 that enables the sequencing of design activities to permit each construction phase to commence when the design for that phase is complete, instead of requiring design for the entire project to be completed before commencing construction.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Transportation as established under Part 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(f) “San Diego Association of Governments” means the consolidated agency created pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6952.

(a) Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the San Diego Association of Governments may utilize the alternative project delivery methods for public transit projects within the jurisdiction of the San Diego Association of Governments.

(b) The San Diego Association of Governments may enter into an alternative project delivery method contract pursuant to this chapter if, after evaluation of the traditional design-bid-build process of construction and of the alternative project delivery method in a public meeting, the San Diego Association of Governments makes a written finding that use of the alternative project delivery method on the specific project under
 consideration will accomplish one or more of the following objectives: reduce project costs, expedite the project’s completion, or provide features not achievable through the design-bid-build method. This finding must be made prior to the San Diego Association of Governments entering into an alternative project delivery method contract. In the alternative project delivery method proposal, the written findings shall be included as part of any application for state funds pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6953.

Any public works project that is contracted for pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the requirements of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 77.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6954.

(a) If a contract for CMGC services is entered into pursuant to this chapter and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, the San Diego Association of Governments shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for preconstruction services, under which the San Diego Association of Governments shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by the San Diego Association of Governments and the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period; provided, however, the San Diego Association of Governments shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed
 maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after the San Diego Association of Governments has entered into a services contract. A preconstruction services contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for construction of all or any discrete phase or phases of the project and shall provide for the San Diego Association of Governments to own the design plans and other preconstruction services work product.

(b) A contract for construction services will be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. In the event that a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not negotiated, the San Diego Association of Governments may award
 the contract for construction services utilizing any other procurement method authorized by law.

(c) The construction manager shall perform not less than 30 percent of the work covered by the fixed price or guaranteed maximum price agreement reached. Work that is not performed directly by the construction manager shall be bid to subcontractors pursuant to Section 6955.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6955.

All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this chapter shall be afforded the protections contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6956.

Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6957.

(a) Upon completion of a project using an alternative project delivery method, the San Diego Association of Governments shall prepare a progress report to its governing body. The progress report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the project.

(2) The entity that was awarded the project.

(3) The estimated and
 actual costs of the project.

(4) The estimated and actual schedule for project completion.

(5) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, proposal, or award of the project, including, but not limited to, the resolution of the protests.

(6) An assessment of the prequalification process and criteria utilized under this chapter if the CMGC procurement method is used.

(7) A description of the method used to evaluate the bid or proposal, including the weighting of each factor and an assessment of the impact of this requirement on a project.

(8) A description
 of any challenges or unexpected problems that arose during the construction of the project and a description of the solutions that were considered and ultimately implemented to address those challenges and problems.

(9) Recommendations to improve the alternative project delivery methods authorized under this chapter.

(b) The progress report shall be made available on the San Diego Association of Governments’ Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6958.

(a) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(b) Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be valid until the project is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (SB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.7. Construction Manager/General Contractor Method: Regional Projects on Expressways [6970. - 6974.]

6970.

(a) This chapter provides for an alternative procurement procedure for certain transportation projects performed by a regional transportation agency.

(b) The Construction Manager/General Contractor method allows the regional transportation agency to engage a construction manager during the design process to provide input on the design. During the design phase, the construction manager provides advice including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the agency to design a more constructible project.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that utilizing a Construction Manager/General
 Contractor method requires a clear understanding of the roles and responsibilities of each participant in the process. The Legislature also finds and declares that cost-effective benefits are achieved by shifting the liability and risk for cost containment and project schedule to the construction manager and by permitting the coherent phasing of projects into discrete contract increments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6971.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the County of Riverside should be considered a transportation planning agency for the purposes of this chapter in order to effectuate the construction of the railroad grade separations and bridge rehabilitations and replacements specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) using Construction Manager/General Contractor authority. The passage of the Road Repair and Accountability Act of 2017 (Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2017) provides additional transportation revenue to help close the significant funding shortfalls and address the substantial backlog of infrastructure projects that are in need of repair. The geography, topography, and location of these railroad grade
 separations and bridge rehabilitations and replacements projects present many potential complex challenges, and the Construction Manager/General Contractor method could reduce delays and ensure that those challenges are fully understood at the outset of construction.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is a licensed contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and that is able to
 provide, or that contracts with entities that are able to provide,
 appropriately licensed contracting or engineering services, or both appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services, as needed pursuant to a Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract.

(2) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” means a project delivery method in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as the
 contract for preconstruction services, or at a later time. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.

(3) “Preconstruction services” means advice during the design phase, including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the regional transportation agency to design a more constructible project.

(4) “Project” means any of the following:

(A) The construction of an expressway that is not on the state highway system.

(B) The construction of the following bridges that are not on the state highway system:

(i) Yerba Buena Island (YBI) West Side Bridges Seismic Retrofit Project.

(ii) Yankee Jims Road Bridge Project in the County of Placer (Replacement/Rehabilitation).

(C) The construction of railroad grade separations and bridge rehabilitations and replacements in the County of Riverside, as specified in Item 2660-110-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016, as amended by Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2017.

(D) The construction, alteration, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of the Golden Gate Bridge, as defined in Section 27502 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(E) A Metrolink commuter rail project.

(F) Any transportation project that is not on the state highway system.

(5) “Regional transportation agency” means any of the following:

(A) A transportation planning agency described in Section 29532 or 29532.1 of the Government Code.

(B) A county transportation commission established under Section 130050, 130050.1, or 130050.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(C) Any other local or regional transportation entity that is designated by statute as a regional transportation agency.

(D) A joint exercise of powers authority established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of
 Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, with the consent of a transportation planning agency or a county transportation commission for the jurisdiction in which the transportation project will be developed.

(E) A local transportation authority created or designated pursuant to Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 131000) or Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000) of the Public Utilities Code.

(F) The Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority established pursuant to Part 12 (commencing with Section 100000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(G) The County of Placer.

(H) The County of Riverside.

(I) The Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District established pursuant to Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 27500) of Part 3 of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(c) This section does not extend any other authority to the County of Riverside or the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District as a transportation planning agency under any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 289, Sec. 2.   (AB 1475)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6972.

(a) A regional transportation agency may utilize the Construction Manager/General Contractor method of procurement to design and construct projects pursuant to this section.

(b) A regional transportation agency may enter into a Construction Manager/General Contractor contract pursuant to this chapter after evaluation of the traditional design-bid-build method of construction and of the Construction Manager/General Contractor method and the board of the regional transportation agency affirmatively adopts the procurement strategy in a public meeting.

(c) The entity responsible for the maintenance of the local streets and roads within the jurisdiction of the
 expressway shall be responsible for the maintenance of the expressway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 753, Sec. 3.   (AB 2374)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6973.

Construction Manager/General Contractor method projects authorized pursuant to Section 6972 shall be governed by the same process, procedures, and requirements as set forth in Section 6703, subdivision (a) of Section 6704, and Sections 6705 to 6708, inclusive, except that any reference to “department” shall mean the regional transportation agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6974.

(a) Upon completion of a project using the Construction Manager/General Contractor method, the regional transportation agency shall prepare a progress report to its governing body. The progress report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the project.

(2) The name of the entity that was awarded the project.

(3) The estimated and actual costs of the project.

(4) The estimated and actual schedule for project completion.

(5) A
 description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, proposal, or award of the project, including, but not limited to, the resolution of the protests.

(6) An assessment of the prequalification process and criteria required by this chapter.

(7) A description of the method used to evaluate the bid or proposal, including the weighting of each factor and an assessment of the impact of this requirement on a project.

(8) A description of any challenges or unexpected problems that arose during the construction of the project and a description of the solutions that were considered and ultimately implemented to address those challenges and problems.

(9) Recommendations to improve the Construction Manager/General Contractor method
 authorized by this chapter.

(b) The progress report shall be made available on the regional transportation agency’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.8. High Road Jobs in Transportation-Related Public Contracts and Grants Pilot Program [6980. - 6986.]

6980.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the High Road Jobs in Transportation-Related Public Contracts and Grants Pilot Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   (SB 674)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 6986.)
-------------------------------------------

6981.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In a time of uncertainty with so many Americans out of work, employment stability and equity are a primary concern.

(2) Spending on green investments creates more jobs per dollar than other infrastructure investments and these jobs are accessible and well paying. Every one million dollars ($1,000,000) in spending on renewable energy creates 7.5 full-time jobs.

(3) Historically vulnerable groups have been disproportionately impacted by economic downturns. For example, for every one percentage
 point increase in the overall unemployment rate, there is a 1.8-percent increase in African American unemployment.

(4) It is essential that the state, in cooperation with the federal government, use all practical and commercially feasible means to promote the prompt and efficient development of energy sources that are renewable or that more efficiently use and conserve scarce energy resources.

(5) It is in the public interest to do all of the following:

(A) Prioritize reversing factors that have resulted in disproportionate health impacts and economic suffering due to the coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic among California’s low-income communities, communities of color, and immigrant communities that have historically faced
 underinvestment and discriminatory policies.

(B) Promote sustainable and renewable energy sources, implement measures that increase efficient energy use, advance transportation technologies that reduce the degradation of the environment, lessen the state’s dependence of fossil fuels, and protect the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state.

(C) Spend resources to avoid recreating historical patterns of injustice by allocating resources in a manner that will create a just transition to a green, regenerative economy, founded on climate, racial, and economic justice, that puts an end to extreme inequality and systemic racial injustice, and ensures all Californians have a clean and safe environment in which to live, work, and play.

(D) Support a just recovery where workers from all sectors who have lost wages or jobs as a direct result of the pandemic will be prioritized for new employment opportunities that guarantee family-sustaining incomes, pensions, benefit training, retraining, and early retirement assistance.

(E) Require recovery spending to include a mandate for a robust, fully funded public sector that includes significant investments in job creation and community development with a particular focus on a just transition for affected workers.

(F) Expend resources in a broadly inclusive economic and democratic process that ensures robust, accessible opportunities for all Californians to determine the future of our government and economy.

(G) Allocate state funds to programs, businesses, organizations, agencies, and institutions that provide the greatest opportunities for good green jobs, strong labor provisions, and climate-based solutions in a manner that is consistent with the urgency of the climate crisis and the need to make rapid and sustained reductions
 in greenhouse gases and statewide emissions reduction targets and recommendations from the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change.

(H) Ensure that recovery funds reach communities most impacted by the coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic and prioritize high road employers, as identified by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, to enhance labor standards, workers’ rights, career pathways, and community benefits.

(I) Restore frontline communities and rapidly accelerate achievements in environmental justice and climate goals, including, but not limited to, climate, environmental, and biodiversity protection and stimulating growth.

(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to support the creation
 of equitable high-quality transportation and related manufacturing and infrastructure jobs in California through the enactment and implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   (SB 674)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 6986.)
-------------------------------------------

6982.

Unless the context requires otherwise, for the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Bidder” means a private entity that applies, bids, or seeks qualification for a covered public contract. “Bidder” may be more than a single entity.

(2) “Bidder” shall not include a firm, as defined in Section 4525 of the Government Code.

(b) “Contractor” means a private entity that has been awarded a covered public contract. 

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), “covered public contract” means, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, a public contract awarded by a relevant public agency for the acquisition of zero-emission transit vehicles or electric vehicle supply equipment valued at ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or more.

(2) (A) “Covered public contract” does not mean contracts for the construction or design of infrastructure, including, but not limited to, roads, bridges, or highways.

(B) “Covered public contract” does not mean a local agreement approved by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency that creates high road jobs.

(C) “Covered public contract” does not mean a contract relating to architecture, landscape architecture, engineering, environmental services, land surveying, or
 construction project management.

(D) “Covered public contract” does not include any of the following:

(i) A contract awarded before January 1, 2023.

(ii) A contract awarded based on a solicitation issued before January 1, 2023.

(iii) A grant or contract related to a grant award announced pursuant to a call for projects that occurred before January 1, 2023.

(d) “High road job standards” means a set of contract terms developed pursuant to Section
 6983 that is a material part of the final contract between the bidder and the relevant public agency. Noncompliance with these commitments would violate the terms of the covered public contract.

(e) “Relevant public agency” means the Department of General Services or the Department of
 Transportation.

(f) “Subcontractor” means a private entity performing a portion of the work of the covered public contract through a subcontract or subgrant.
